Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [245D.13] OUT-OF-HOME RESPITE CARE SERVICES FOR CHILDREN. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Licensed setting required. new text end new text begin A license holder with a home and community-based services license providing out-of-home respite care services for children may do so only in a licensed setting, unless exempt under subdivision 2. For the purposes of this section, "respite care services" has the meaning given in section 245A.02, subdivision 15. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Exemption from licensed setting requirement. new text end new text begin (a) The exemption under this subdivision does not apply to the provision of respite care services to a child in foster care under chapter 260C or 260D. new text end new text begin (b) A license holder with a home and community-based services license may provide out-of-home respite care services for children in an unlicensed residential setting if: new text end new text begin (1) all background studies are completed according to the requirements in chapter 245C; new text end new text begin (2) a child's case manager conducts and documents an assessment of the residential setting and its environment before services are provided and at least once each calendar year thereafter if services continue to be provided at that residence. The assessment must ensure that the setting is suitable for the child receiving respite care services. The assessment must be conducted and documented in the manner prescribed by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (3) the child's legal representative visits the residence and signs and dates a statement authorizing services in the residence before services are provided and at least once each calendar year thereafter if services continue to be provided at that residence; new text end new text begin (4) the services are provided in a residential setting that is not licensed to provide any other licensed services; new text end new text begin (5) the services are provided to no more than four children at any one time. Each child must have an individual bedroom, except two siblings may share a bedroom; new text end new text begin (6) the services are not provided to children and adults over the age of 21 in the same residence at the same time; new text end new text begin (7) the services are not provided to a single family for more than 46 calendar days in a calendar year and no more than ten consecutive days; new text end new text begin (8) the license holder's license was not made conditional, suspended, or revoked during the previous 24 months; and new text end new text begin (9) each individual in the residence at the time services are provided, other than individuals receiving services, is an employee, as defined under section 245C.02, of the license holder and has had a background study completed under chapter 245C. No other household members or other individuals may be present in the residence while services are provided. new text end new text begin (c) A child may not receive out-of-home respite care services in more than two unlicensed residential settings in a calendar year. new text end new text begin (d) The license holder must ensure the requirements in this section are met. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Documentation requirements. new text end new text begin The license holder must maintain documentation of the following: new text end new text begin (1) background studies completed under chapter 245C; new text end new text begin (2) service recipient records indicating the calendar dates and times when services were provided; new text end new text begin (3) the case manager's initial residential setting assessment and each residential assessment completed thereafter; and new text end new text begin (4) the legal representative's approval of the residential setting before services are provided and each year thereafter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall inform the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end